Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.650.050

Digital citizenship, internet safety, and media literacy—Web-based location with links recommending practices and resources.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall create a web-based location with links to recommended successful practices and resources to support digital citizenship, media literacy, and internet safety for use in the 2017-18 school year. The web-based location must incorporate the information gathered by the survey in section 3, chapter 90, Laws of 2017.

(2) Thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall continue to identify and develop additional open educational resources to support digital citizenship, media literacy, and internet safety in schools for the web-based location.

(3) Media literacy resources must consist of a balance of sources and perspectives.

[ 2017 c 90 s 4.]